South Dakota, session 2026, HB1080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-5:
Any individual who is a business owner, and a veteran as defined in § 33A-2-1,
and who meets the requirements of §§ 32-5-154 to 32-5-166, inclusive, may apply for
and display one set of military specialty plates on a noncommercial vehicle registered to
the business, provided the veteran is listed as an additional owner on the certificate of
title of the vehicle pursuant to § 32-3-18.
The vehicle registration must state each owner of the motor vehicle pursuant to
§§ 32-5-2 and 32-5-3.
The vehicle must be a noncommercial automobile, pickup truck, or van licensed
pursuant to § 32-5-6.
Pursuant to § 32-5-159, the owner must pay an additional fee of ten dollars for the
initial issuance of military specialty plates, in addition to noncommercial annual
registration and plate fees, unless the owner is exempt from fees pursuant to § 32-5-160.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-5:
A business owner and a veteran, as defined in § 33A-2-1, who is listed as an
additional owner on the title and registration of a vehicle registered to the veteran's
business, pursuant to section 1 of this Act, does not assume any additional liability
resulting from the ownership of military special plates.

26.228.24 2 1080
An Act to allow a business owner who is a veteran to display military specialty plates on a
noncommercial vehicle registered to the veteran's business and to limit personal liability to
the business owner and veteran.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1080
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1080 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1080 ENROLLED